Georgia statutes. TITLE 1 General Provisions
CHAPTER 3 Laws and Statutes

Cross references.

Duty of Secretary of State to provide copies of legislative Acts to Office of Legislative Counsel and to court clerks, § 45-13-24.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1986, p. 529), the General Assembly designated the English language as the official language of the State of Georgia.

Law reviews.

For article discussing problems of construction when repeal statutes are subsequently repealed, see 10 Ga. St. B. J. 41 (1973).

For article, “Statutes of Nonstatutory Origin,” see 14 Ga. L. Rev. 239 (1980).

For article, “Law Among the Pleonasms: The Futility and Aconstitutionality of Legislative History in Statutory Interpretation,” see 41 Emory L.J. 113 (1992).

1-3-1.
Construction of statutes generally.

In all interpretations of statutes, the courts shall look diligently for the intention of the General Assembly, keeping in view at all times the old law, the evil, and the remedy. Grammatical errors shall not vitiate a law. A transposition of words and clauses may be resorted to when a sentence or clause is without meaning as it stands.

In all interpretations of statutes, the ordinary signification shall be applied to all words, except words of art or words connected with a particular trade or subject matter, which shall have the signification attached to them by experts in such trade or with reference to such subject matter.

A substantial compliance with any statutory requirement, especially on the part of public officers, shall be deemed and held sufficient, and no proceeding shall be declared void for want of such compliance, unless expressly so provided by law.

In addition to the rules for construction prescribed in subsections (a) through (c) of this Code section, the rules provided in this subsection shall govern the construction of all statutes with respect to the subjects enumerated.

Bonds. When a bond is required by law, an undertaking in writing, without seal, is sufficient; and in all bonds where the names of the obligors do not appear in the bond but are subscribed thereto, they are bound thereby.

Census. Whenever there is used in the statutory law of this state the term “federal census,” “United States census,” “decennial census,” or similar words referring to the official census conducted every ten years by the United States of America or any agency thereof as required by Article I, Section II, Paragraph III of the Constitution of the United States, the effective date of such census for the purpose of making operative and of force any statutory law of this state shall be determined as follows:

The effective date of the census shall be January 1 of the second year after the year in which the census is conducted, for the purpose of making operative and of force the following laws:

Code Section 15-16-20;

Code Sections 15-6-88 through 15-6-91;

Code Section 48-5-183;

Code Sections 15-9-63 through 15-9-66;

Code Section 36-5-25;

Code Section 15-10-23; and

Code Section 45-16-11;provided, however, that if a county’s population decreases according to a more recent census below its population according to an earlier census, then, notwithstanding any other provision of law, any officer who is compensated under a law specified in this subparagraph and who is in office on the date specified in this subparagraph shall continue during his or her entire tenure in such office (including any future terms of office in such office) to be compensated on the basis of the county’s population according to such earlier census;

For purposes of any program of grants of state funds to local governments, the effective date of the census shall be July 1 of the first year after the year in which the census is conducted;

For the purpose of reconstituting the membership of any constitutional or statutory board, commission, or body whose members are appointed from congressional districts, the effective date of the census shall be January 1 of the third year after the year in which the census is conducted;

The effective date of the census shall be July 1 of the second year after the year in which the census is conducted for the purpose of making operative and of force all other statutory laws which do not expressly provide otherwise.

Computation of time. Except as otherwise provided by time period computations specifically applying to other laws, when a period of time measured in days, weeks, months, years, or other measurements of time except hours is prescribed for the exercise of any privilege or the discharge of any duty, the first day shall not be counted but the last day shall be counted; and, if the last day falls on Saturday or Sunday, the party having such privilege or duty shall have through the following Monday to exercise the privilege or to discharge the duty. When the last day prescribed for such action falls on a public and legal holiday as set forth in Code Section 1-4-1, the party having the privilege or duty shall have through the next business day to exercise the privilege or to discharge the duty. When the period of time prescribed is less than seven days, intermediate Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays shall be excluded in the computation.

Gender. The masculine gender includes the feminine and the neuter.

Joint authority. A joint authority given to any number of persons or officers may be executed by a majority of them, unless it is otherwise declared.

Number. The singular or plural number each includes the other, unless the other is expressly excluded.

Tense. The present or past tense includes the future.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 5; Code 1868, § 4; Code 1873, § 4; Code 1882, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 4; Penal Code 1895, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 4; Penal Code 1910, § 1; Code 1933, § 102-102; Ga. L. 1958, p. 388, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 608, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 579, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 951, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 648, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1903, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 902, § 22; Ga. L. 2012, p. 173, § 2-1/HB 665; Ga. L. 2018, p. 356, § 2-1/SB 436; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1015, § 11/SB 171.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “15-9-66” for “15-9-67” in division (d)(2)(A)(iv).

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subparagraph (d)(2)(A), substituted “January 1 of the second year” for “July 1 of the first year” in the introductory language, and inserted “or her” in the ending undesignated paragraph.

Cross references.

Computation of time in regard to exercise of privileges or discharge of duties prescribed or required by election laws, §

21-2-14

.

Construction of multiple amendments to same Code provision, §

28-9-5

.

Law reviews.

For comment on Tarrant v. Davis,

62 Ga. App. 880

,

10 S.E.2d 636

(1940), see 3 Ga. B. J. 54 (1941).

For comment on Tift v. Bush,

209 Ga. 769

,

75 S.E.2d 805

(1953), see 16 Ga. B. J. 224 (1953).

For comment on Wilkinson v. Townsend,

96 Ga. App. 179

,

99 S.E.2d 539

(1957) wherein the statutory authorization for the police to remove an abandoned automobile to a garage was held not to create an agency relationship between the police and auto owner giving rise to a lien against the auto owner by the garageman, see 9 Mercer L. Rev. 372 (1958).

For article comparing sections of the “Georgia Civil Practice Act” with preexisting provisions of the Georgia Code, see 3 Ga. St. B. J. 295 (1967).

For note, “Regulation and Ownership of the Marshlands: The Georgia Marshlands Act,” see 5 Ga. L. Rev. 563 (1971).

For article on the problems and benefits of multiple fiduciaries in estate planning, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 355 (1981).

For article surveying Insurance Law in 1984-1985, see 37 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (1985).

For article surveying administrative law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 17 (1986).

For article, “The Amended Open Meetings Law: New Requirements for Publicly Funded Corporations As Well As Governmental Agencies,” see 25 Ga. St. B. J. 78 (1988).

For article, “The Canons of Construction in Georgia: Anachronisms in Action,” see 25 Ga. L. Rev. 365 (1991).

For article on commercial law, see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 153 (2001).

For article on construction law, see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 173 (2001).

For article on trial practice and procedure, see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 475 (2001).

For survey article on administrative law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2008).

For annual survey of law on real property, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 283 (2010).

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 305 (2012).

For article, “Researching Georgia Law,” see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 741 (2015).

1-3-2.
Construction of definitions.

As used in this Code or in any other law of this state, defined words shall have the meanings specified, unless the context in which the word or term is used clearly requires that a different meaning be used.

1-3-3.
Definitions.

As used in this Code or in any other law of this state, the term:

“Abode” ordinarily means domicile.

“Accident” means an event which takes place without one’s foresight or expectation or design.

“Act of God” means an accident produced by physical causes which are irresistible or inevitable, such as lightning, storms, perils of the sea, earthquakes, inundations, sudden death, or illness. This expression excludes all idea of human agency.

“Aforesaid” means next before.

(4.1)

“Agriculture,” “agricultural operations,” or “agricultural or farm products” means raising, harvesting, or storing of crops; feeding, breeding, or managing livestock or poultry; producing or storing feed for use in the production of livestock, including, but not limited to, cattle, calves, swine, hogs, goats, sheep, and rabbits, or for use in the production of poultry, including, but not limited to, chickens, hens, ratites, and turkeys; producing plants, trees, fowl, or animals; or the production of aquacultural, horticultural, dairy, livestock, poultry, eggs, and apiarian products. If the term “agriculture,” “agricultural operations,” or “agricultural or farm products” is defined in Title 2, Title 4, Title 10, or Title 11 or in any chapter, article, part, subpart, or Code section of such titles, such specific definition shall control for such purposes over the definition contained in this paragraph. Agricultural or farm products are considered grown in this state if such products are grown, produced, or processed in this state, whether or not such products are composed of constituent products grown or produced outside this state.

“As soon as possible” means within a reasonable time, having due regard to all the circumstances.

“Child” or “grandchild” means legitimate descendants.

“County governing authority” means the board of county commissioners, the sole county commissioner, or the governing authority of a consolidated government.

(7.1)

“Crops” or “growing crops” means fruits and products of all annual or perennial plants, trees, and shrubs and shall also include plants, trees, shrubs, and other agricultural products that are produced for sale. If the term “crops” or “growing crops” is defined in Title 2, Title 4, or Title 10 or in any chapter, article, part, subpart, or Code section of such titles, such specific definition shall control for such purposes over the definition contained in this paragraph.

“Following” means next after.

“Lunatic,” “insane,” or “non compos mentis” each includes all persons of unsound mind.

“May” ordinarily denotes permission and not command. However, where the word as used concerns the public interest or affects the rights of third persons, it shall be construed to mean “must” or “shall.”

“Month” means a calendar month. A scholastic month in public schools is 20 school days.

“Oath” includes affirmation.

“Penitentiary” means any place where inmates are confined under the authority of any law of this state.

“Person” includes a corporation.

“Preceding” means next before.

“Property” includes real and personal property.

(16.1)

“Ratites” mean any members of the ratite family, including but not limited to ostriches, emus, and rheas, which are not indigenous to this state and which are raised for the purpose of producing meat, fiber, or animal by-products or as breeding stock. For the purposes of the laws of this state, ratites shall be treated as poultry and the term poultry as used in this Code or any law of this state shall include ratites unless such ratites are specifically excluded from the operation of any such law or unless such law or the operation thereof is restricted to a certain type of poultry.

“Seal” includes impressions on the paper itself, as well as impressions on wax or wafers. With the exception of official seals, a scrawl or any other mark intended as a seal shall be held as such.

“Sickness” means any affection of the body which deprives it temporarily of the power to fulfill its usual functions.

“Signature” or “subscription” includes the mark of an illiterate or infirm person.

(19.5)

“Statutory overnight delivery” shall have the meaning provided for in subsection (b) of Code Section 9-10-12.

“Trespass” means any misfeasance, transgression, or offense which damages another’s health, reputation, or property.

“Until,” when used with reference to a certain day, includes all of such day.

“Whereas” means considering that.

“Writing” includes printing and all numerals.

“Year” means a calendar year.

History.

Laws 1838, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 274, 536; Laws 1833, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 780; Code 1863, § 6; Code 1868, § 5; Code 1873, § 5; Code 1882, § 5; Civil Code 1895, § 5; Penal Code 1895, § 2; Ga. L. 1896, p. 82, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 5; Penal Code 1910, § 2; Code 1933, § 102-103; Ga. L. 1957, p. 477, § 6; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1482, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1849, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2398, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 347, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 23; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 1/SB 364.

History of Code section.

The language of this Code section is derived in part from the decisions in
Central of Ga. Ry. v. Hall,

124 Ga. 322

,

52 S.E. 679

(1905);
Georgia F. & A. Ry. v. Sasser,

130 Ga. 394

,

60 S.E. 997

(1908);
W.E. Coldwell Co. v. Cowart,

138 Ga. 233

,

75 S.E. 425

(1912);
Great Am. Coop. Fire Ass’n v. Jenkins,

11 Ga. App. 784

,

76 S.E. 159

(1912);
Martin v. Waycross Coca-Cola Bottling Co.,

18 Ga. App. 226

,

89 S.E. 495

(1916);
Gainesville Grocery Co. v. Bank of Dahlonega,

25 Ga. App. 230

,

102 S.E. 912

(1920);
Browning v. State,

31 Ga. App. 150

,

120 S.E. 649

(1923);
Evans v. Cannon,

34 Ga. App. 470

,

130 S.E. 76

(1925);
Central of Ga. Ry. v. Council Bros.,

36 Ga. App. 574

,

137 S.E. 569

(1927);
Hanson v. Williams,

170 Ga. 779

,

154 S.E. 240

(1930).

Cross references.

Construction of terms “city,” “town,” “municipality,” and “village” as synonymous, §

36-30-1

.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Georgia Law of Insanity,” see 3 Ga. B. J. 28 (1941).

For note comparing procedures for hospitalization of the mentally ill in Georgia to other jurisdictions and suggesting improvements, see 7 Mercer L. Rev. 361 (1956).

For note discussing concept of “act of God,” see 4 Ga. L. Rev. 555 (1970).

For survey article on insurance, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 177 (1982).

For article, “Publicity, Liberty and Intellectual Property: A Conceptual and Economic Analysis of the Inheritability Issue,” see 34 Emory L.J. 1 (1985).

For survey article on law of torts, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 397 (2007).

1-3-4.
Effective date of legislative Acts.

Unless a different effective date is specified in an Act:

Any Act which is approved by the Governor or which becomes law without his approval on or after the first day of January and prior to the first day of July of a calendar year shall become effective on the first day of July; and

Any Act which is approved by the Governor or which becomes law without his approval on or after the first day of July and prior to the first day of January of the immediately succeeding calendar year shall become effective on the first day of January.

Subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to local legislation or to resolutions intended to have the effect of law. Such local legislation and resolutions intended to have the effect of law become effective immediately upon approval by the Governor or upon their becoming law without his approval, unless a different effective date is specified in the Act or resolution.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1364, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 7, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 984, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 985, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 984, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would apply to general Acts affecting the compensation of the county officers listed in Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. III which are enacted after January 1, 1986.

1-3-4.1.
Effective date for general Acts requiring increases in compensation of certain county officials.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 1-3-4, no general Act which provides for an increase in compensation to one or more of the county officials listed in Article IX, Section I, Paragraph III of the Constitution or Chapter 10 of Title 15 shall be effective until the first day of January following passage of the Act.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-3-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 984, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1397, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1197, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 11, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 985, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 1.

Cross references.

Specific provisions regarding compensation of county officers listed in Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. III, §

15-6-88

et seq. (clerk of the superior court), §

15-9-63

et seq. (judge of the probate court), §

15-16-20

et seq. (sheriff), §§

48-5-180

,

48-5-183

(tax receiver, tax collector, and tax commissioner).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, “Code Section” was substituted for “O.C.G.A.R.”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 984, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would apply to general Acts affecting the compensation of the county officers listed in Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. III which are enacted after January 1, 1986.

1-3-5.
Operation of laws generally; retrospective operation.

Laws prescribe only for the future; they cannot impair the obligation of contracts nor, ordinarily, have a retrospective operation. Laws looking only to the remedy or mode of trial may apply to contracts, rights, and offenses entered into, accrued, or committed prior to their passage; but in every case a reasonable time subsequent to the passage of the law should be allowed for the citizen to enforce his contract or to protect his right.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 7; Code 1868, § 6; Code 1873, § 6; Code 1882, § 6; Civil Code 1895, § 6; Penal Code 1895, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 6; Penal Code 1910, § 3; Code 1933, § 102-104.

Cross references.

Restrictions upon powers of states, U.S. Const., Art. I, Sec. 10, Cl. 1. Bill of attainer; ex post facto laws; and retroactive laws, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. X.

Law reviews.

For article, “Synopses of 1968 Amendments Appellate Procedure Act and Georgia Civil Practice Act,” see 4 Ga. St. B. J. 503 (1968).

For comment on Griffin v. Air S., Inc., 324 F. Supp. 1284 (N.D. Ga. 1971), see 8 Ga. St. B. J. 414 (1972).

For comment on statutes of limitations in medical malpractice actions in Georgia, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 377 (1981).

1-3-6.
When laws become obligatory; effect of ignorance.

After they take effect, the laws of this state are obligatory upon all the inhabitants thereof. Ignorance of the law excuses no one.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 8; Code 1868, § 7; Code 1873, § 7; Code 1882, § 7; Civil Code 1895, § 7; Penal Code 1895, § 4; Civil Code 1910, § 7; Penal Code 1910, § 4; Code 1933, § 102-105.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law on administrative law, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2010).

1-3-7.
Abrogation of laws by agreement; waiver or renunciation of benefits established by law.

Laws made for the preservation of public order or good morals may not be dispensed with or abrogated by any agreement. However, a person may waive or renounce what the law has established in his favor when he does not thereby injure others or affect the public interest.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 11; Code 1868, § 10; Code 1873, § 10; Code 1882, § 10; Civil Code 1895, § 10; Penal Code 1895, § 5; Civil Code 1910, § 10; Penal Code 1910, § 5; Code 1933, § 102-106.

Law reviews.

For note, “The Scope and Meaning of Waiver in Section 2-209 of the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 5 Ga. L. Rev. 783 (1971).

For comment on Ware v. State,

128 Ga. App. 407

,

196 S.E.2d 896

(1973), discussing the right of an accused to retract guilty plea prior to judgment, see 10 Ga. St. B. J. 469 (1974).

For comment, “Eleventh Circuit Survey:
January 1, 2013 - December 31, 2013:
Comment:
Confirming the Enforceability of the Guaranty Agreement After Non-Judicial Foreclosure in Georgia,” see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 1167 (2014).

1-3-8.
Binding effect of legislation upon state.

The state is not bound by the passage of a law unless it is named therein or unless the words of the law are so plain, clear, and unmistakable as to leave no doubt as to the intention of the General Assembly.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 3; Code 1933, § 102-109.

History of Code section.

The language of this Code section is derived in part from the decision in Lingo v. Harris,

73 Ga. 28

(1884), and Mayor of Brunswick v. King,

91 Ga. 524

,

17 S.E. 940

(1892).

1-3-9.
Effect and enforcement of foreign laws.

The laws of other states and foreign nations shall have no force and effect of themselves within this state further than is provided by the Constitution of the United States and is recognized by the comity of states. The courts shall enforce this comity, unless restrained by the General Assembly, so long as its enforcement is not contrary to the policy or prejudicial to the interests of this state.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 10; Code 1868, § 9; Code 1873, § 9; Code 1882, § 9; Civil Code 1895, § 9; Civil Code 1910, § 9; Code 1933, § 102-110.

Cross references.

Rights of citizens of other states or nations to sue or give evidence, §

1-2-10

.

Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act, §

9-12-110

et seq.

Judicial enforcement of taxes imposed by other states, §

48-2-80

.

Law reviews.

For article discussing convergence of standards governing limits of state’s personal jurisdiction and applicability of state substantive law, see 9 J. of Pub. L. 282 (1960).

For article advocating replacement of the lex loci delicti doctrine in Georgia with a national interest analysis approach, see 20 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (1969).

For note, “Interstitial Lawmaking: Uniformity or Conformity?” see 32 Mercer L. Rev. 1235 (1981).

For articles on conflict of law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 469 (1983) and 35 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1984).

For article discussing recent developments in the area of conflict of laws, see 39 Mercer L. Rev. 411 (1987).

For article comparing “rules” and “analysis” approaches to choice of law, see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 869 (1989).

For article, “An Essay on Illusion and Reality in the Conflict of Laws,” see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 819 (2019).

1-3-10.
Execution of writings and contracts.

Except for wills of personalty of persons domiciled in another state or country, when writings or contracts are intended to have effect in this state they must be executed in conformity to the laws of this state.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 9; Code 1868, § 8; Code 1873, § 8; Code 1882, § 8; Civil Code 1895, § 8; Civil Code 1910, § 8; Code 1933, § 102-108; Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 188, § 38.

Cross references.

Required writing; signing; witnesses; codicil, § 53-4-20.

Law reviews.

For comment on Fimian v. Guy F. Atkinson Co.,

209 Ga. 113

,

70 S.E.2d 762

(1952), see 15 Ga. B. J. 217 (1952).

For comment on Guy F. Atkinson Co. v. Fimian,

85 Ga. App. 200

,

68 S.E.2d 236

(1951), as to choice of law governing a contract made in a different state than that in which it was to be performed, see 3 Mercer L. Rev. 346 (1952).

For article criticizing Georgia’s traditional rules for determining choice of law questions and discussing available alternatives, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 787 (1983).

1-3-11.
Local referenda on abolishing offices or shortening or lengthening term.

No office to which a person has been elected shall be abolished nor the term of the office shortened or lengthened by local or special Act during the term for which such person was elected unless the same shall be approved by the people of the jurisdiction affected in a referendum on the question.

History.

Code 1981, §

1-3-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 685, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section continues in effect a similar provision which was contained in Art. III, Sec. VII, Para. IX of the Constitution of Georgia of 1976.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006).